Utah statutes.
17B-1-906.   Extraterritorial supply of surplus.

If a local district runs a surplus product or surplus capacity of a service that the local district is authorized to provide under Section 17B-1-202, the local district may sell or deliver the product or service to others beyond the local district boundaries.



Enacted by Chapter 106, 2011 General Session

